South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S497.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.   The regulations of the Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation, relating to Fee Schedules, designated as Regulation Document Number 5348, and submitted to the General Assembly pursuant to the provisions of Article 1, Chapter 23, Title 1 of the S.C. Code, are approved. SECTION 2.   This joint resolution takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XXX---- SUMMARY AS SUBMITTED BY PROMULGATING AGENCY. The South Carolina Department of Labor, Licensing and Regulation proposes to add to, amend or repeal fees within the fee schedules for certain boards and commissions whose fees appear in Chapter 10 of the South Carolina Code of Regulations. The Notice of Drafting was published in the State Register on June 28, 2024. ----XX----